apertium-pl-uk.pl.dix
    <pardef n="nakarm/ić__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ić</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ię</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czyta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ią</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytałem"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zdanie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__jedzony"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ino</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iwszy</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zapewn/ić__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ić</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ię</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czyta"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ią</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ij</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytałem"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ie</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zdanie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__jedzony"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ino</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="impers"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iwszy</l>
          <r>ić<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="wie/dzieć__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>dzieć</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sz</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cie</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzą</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dz</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dzi</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wiedziałem"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dze</l>
          <r>dzieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zdanie"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="chc/ieć__vblex">
      <e>
         <p>
          <l>ieć</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ę</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>esz</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>emy</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ecie</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iej</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__czytaj"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__wiedziałem"/>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąc</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__będący"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ąc</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>ieć<s n="vblex"/><s n="imperf"/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__zdanie"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="wiedzieć"><i>wie</i><par n="wie/dzieć__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="chcieć"><i>chc</i><par n="chc/ieć__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="nakarmić"><i>nakarm</i><par n="nakarm/ić__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="zapewnić"><i>zapewn</i><par n="zapewn/ić__vblex"/></e>
